Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0577.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 9. (1) The department shall classify public water supplies, including water treatment and distribution systems at community supplies, with regard to size, type, location, and other physical conditions for the purpose of establishing the skill, knowledge, and experience that individuals need to maintain and operate the systems effectively. (2) The director shall appoint an advisory board of examiners that shall assist the department in the examination of individuals as to their competency to operate water treatment systems and water distribution systems. The advisory board shall make recommendations to the department relative to the certification of those individuals. (3) The membership of the advisory board consists of all of the following: (a) Two certified water treatment operators. (b) Two certified water distribution operators. (c) One superintendent or manager of a supplier of water. (d) One representative of the administrative branch of a local governmental agency. (e) Two members of the public at large. (f) One professor of sanitary or environmental engineering at a university in this state. (4) A representative of the department shall be the nonvoting secretary for the board. (5) For individuals that meet the requirements, the department shall issue certificates that acknowledge their competency to operate a specified class of waterworks system or portion of waterworks system. The department may suspend or revoke a certificate as specified by rule. (6) A public water supply must be under the supervision of a properly certified operator as specified in the rules promulgated under this act. (7) Operators certified under this act shall renew the certificates in accordance with the rules promulgated under this act, including mandatory continuing education or competency demonstration. (8) In accordance with section 3110 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.3110, the department may conduct a program for training individuals that seek to be certified as operators under this section and shall administer operator certification programs for individuals that seek to be certified as operators under this section. Until October 1, 2029, the department may charge fees for these programs in accordance with section 3110 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.3110. The department shall transmit fees collected under this section to the state treasurer for deposit into the operator training and certification fund created in section 3134 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.3134. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor